Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.190

Valid license prerequisite to suits.

In addition to remedies otherwise provided by law, in any action brought by or on behalf of a person required to be licensed or to hold an interim permit under this chapter, or by any assignee or transferee, it shall be necessary to allege and prove that the licensee or interim permit holder at the time of the transaction held a valid license or interim permit as required by this chapter, and that such license or interim permit has not been suspended or revoked pursuant to RCW 18.35.110, 18.35.120, or 18.130.160.

[ 2002 c 310 s 20; 1998 c 142 s 14; 1996 c 200 s 26; 1989 c 198 s 8; 1987 c 150 s 24; 1983 c 39 s 14; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.